Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Obscenity

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

50 Am. Jur. 2d Lewdness, Indecency and Obscenity §§ 3 to 30.

Validity and construction of statutes or ordinances prohibiting profanity or profane swearing or cursing, 5 ALR4th 956.

Liability of church or religious society for sexual misconduct of clergy, 5 ALR5th 530.

Obscenity prosecutions: Statutory exemption based on dissemination to persons or entities having scientific, educational, or similar justification for possession of such materials, 13 ALR5th 567.

67 C.J.S. Obscenity § 1 et seq.

§ 6-4-301.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Disseminate” means to sell, distribute, deliver, provide, exhibit or otherwise make available to another;

“Material” includes any form of human expression or communication intended for, or capable of, visual, auditory or sensory perception;

“Obscene” is material which the average person would find:

Applying contemporary community standards, taken as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest;

Applying contemporary community standards, depicts or describes sexual conduct in a patently offensive way; and

Taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political or scientific value.

“Produce or reproduce” means to bring into being regardless of the process or means employed. Undeveloped photographs, films, molds, casts, printing plates and like articles may be obscene notwithstanding that further processing or other acts are necessary to make the obscenity patent or to disseminate or exhibit the obscene material;

“Sexual conduct” means:

Patently offensive representations or descriptions of ultimate sexual acts, normal or perverted, actual or simulated;

Sado-masochistic abuse; or

Patently offensive representations or descriptions of masturbation, excretory functions or lewd exhibitions of the genitals.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Jury instructions.—

District court did not abuse its discretion by refusing to give the defense’s requested instruction on the definition of obscene the definition of “obscene” for statutes that punished pure speech does not apply to criminal stalking, but instead, the word should be given its ordinary meaning. Dugan v. State, 2019 WY 112, 451 P.3d 731,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2019), cert. denied, 140 S. Ct. 1298, 206 L. Ed. 2d 377, 2020 U.S. LEXIS 1610 (U.S. 2020).

"Obscene."—

District court’s refusal to require proof that defendant’s statements met the definition of “obscene” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-4-301

did not render Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-506

unconstitutional as applied to him; the punishment of obscenity under laws that regulate pure speech is much different than the punishment of harassing conduct which includes obscene statements. Dugan v. State, 2019 WY 112, 451 P.3d 731,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2019), cert. denied, 140 S. Ct. 1298, 206 L. Ed. 2d 377, 2020 U.S. LEXIS 1610 (U.S. 2020).

There is no right of private
action based on §§

1-29-106

,

6-4-301

and

6-4-302

.

Dworkin v. Hustler Magazine, Inc., 634 F. Supp. 727, 1986 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 26567 (D. Wyo. 1986).

Stated

in

Dougherty v. State, 2010 WY 127, 239 P.3d 1176,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Sept. 21, 2010).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Musical sound recording as punishable obscenity, 30 ALR5th 718.

§ 6-4-302.
Promoting obscenity; penalties.

A person commits the crime of promoting obscenity if he:

Produces or reproduces obscene material with the intent of disseminating it;

Possesses obscene material with the intent of disseminating it; or

Knowingly disseminates obscene material.

Promoting obscenity is a misdemeanor punishable upon conviction as follows:

If to an adult, by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment for not to exceed one (1) year, or both;

If to a minor, for each violation, by a fine not to exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000.00) or by imprisonment for not to exceed one (1) year, or both.

This section shall not apply to any person who may produce, reproduce, possess or disseminate obscene material:

In the course of law enforcement and judicial activities;

In the course of bona fide school, college, university, museum or public library activities or in the course of employment of such an organization.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

As to an attorney being subjected to disciplinary action for inserting scandalous or indecent matter in pleadings, see Rule 11, W.R.C.P.

There is no right of private
action based on §§

1-29-106

,

6-4-301

and

6-4-302

.

Dworkin v. Hustler Magazine, Inc., 634 F. Supp. 727, 1986 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 26567 (D. Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and effect of statutes or ordinances prohibiting the sale of obsence materials to minors, 93 ALR3d 297.

In personam or territorial jurisdiction of state court in connection with obscenity prosecution of author, actor, photographer, publisher, distributor or other party whose acts were performed outside the state, 16 ALR4th 1318.

Processor's right to refuse to process or return film or video tape of obscene subject, 18 ALR4th 1326.

Validity and application of statute exempting nonmanagerial, nonfinancially interested employees from obscenity prosecution, 35 ALR4th 1237.

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes or ordinances regulating sexual performance by child, 42 ALR5th 291.

Constitutionality of state statutes banning distribution of sexual devices, 94 ALR5th 497.

Validity and construction of 18 USC §§ 371 and 2252(a) penalizing mailing or receiving, or conspiring to mail or receive, child pornography, 86 ALR Fed 359.

Construction and application of United States Sentencing Guidelines § 2G2.1 et seq., pertaining to child pornography, 145 ALR Fed 481.

§ 6-4-303.
Sexual exploitation of children; penalties; definitions.

As used in this section:

“Child” means a person under the age of eighteen (18) years;

“Child pornography” means any visual depiction, including any photograph, film, video, picture, computer or computer-generated image or picture, whether or not made or produced by electronic, mechanical or other means, of explicit sexual conduct, where:

The production of the visual depiction involves the use of a child engaging in explicit sexual conduct;

The visual depiction is of explicit sexual conduct involving a child or an individual virtually indistinguishable from a child; or

The visual depiction has been created, adapted or modified to depict explicit sexual conduct involving a child or an individual virtually indistinguishable from a child.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 70, § 2.

“Explicit sexual conduct” means actual or simulated sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital or oral-anal, between persons of the same or opposite sex, bestiality, masturbation, sadistic or masochistic abuse or lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any person;

“Visual depiction” means developed and undeveloped film and videotape, and data stored on computer disk or by electronic means which is capable of conversion into a visual image.

A person is guilty of sexual exploitation of a child if, for any purpose, he knowingly:

Causes, induces, entices, coerces or permits a child to engage in, or be used for, the making of child pornography;

Causes, induces, entices or coerces a child to engage in, or be used for, any explicit sexual conduct;

Manufactures, generates, creates, receives, distributes, reproduces, delivers or possesses with the intent to deliver, including through digital or electronic means, whether or not by computer, any child pornography;

Possesses child pornography, except that this paragraph shall not apply to:

Peace officers, court personnel or district attorneys engaged in the lawful performance of their official duties;

Physicians, psychologists, therapists or social workers, provided such persons are duly licensed in Wyoming and the persons possess such materials in the course of a bona fide treatment or evaluation program at the treatment or evaluation site; or

Counsel for a person charged under this section.

The sexual exploitation of a child pursuant to paragraphs (b)(i) through (iii) of this section is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than five (5) years nor more than twelve (12) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

The sexual exploitation of a child by possession of sexually exploitive material pursuant to paragraph (b)(iv) of this section is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

A second or subsequent conviction pursuant to paragraphs (b)(i) through (iv) of this section, or of a substantially similar law of any other jurisdiction, is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than seven (7) years nor more than twelve (12) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

Any person who is convicted of an offense under this section shall forfeit to the state the person’s interest in:

Any visual depiction of a child engaging in explicit sexual conduct in violation of this section, or any book, magazine, periodical, film, videotape or other matter which contains any such visual depiction, which was produced, transported, mailed, shipped, possessed or received in violation of this section;

Any property, real or personal, constituting or traceable to gross proceeds obtained from such offense;

Any property, real or personal, used or intended to be used to commit or to promote the commission of such offense.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 180, § 1; 2005, ch. 70, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 159, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to administrative subpoena authority for investigations of child exploitation, see
§

9-1-640

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, clarified that child pornography involves a visual depiction of a child or an individual virtually indistinguishable from a child rather than appears to be of a child engaging in explicit conduct in (a)(ii)(B) and (a)(ii)(C), and repealed former (a)(ii)(D), which read: “The visual depiction is advertised, promoted, described or distributed in a manner that conveys the impression that the material is, or contains, a visual depiction of a child engaging in explicit sexual conduct.”

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “less than five (5) years nor” in (c); in (e), deleted “or any violation of this section involving child pornography depicting a child under the age of twelve (12) years,” following “law of any other jurisdiction” and inserted “less than seven (7) years nor.”

Sufficient evidence. —

There was sufficient evidence at trial to support defendant’s convictions for sexual exploitation of a child because the jury could reasonably conclude the video met the definition of child pornography in that it was a visual depiction involving the use of a child engaged in simulated oral-genital intercourse. Barrett v. State, 2022 WY 64, 509 P.3d 940,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2022).

Constitutionality. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-4-303

is not facially overbroad under the First Amendment. Even if at least two one of the definitions of child pornography in a federal statute paralleling §

6-4-303

were struck down as unconstitutional in Ashcroft v. Free Speech Coalition, 535 U.S. 234, 122 S. Ct. 1389, 152 L. Ed. 2d 403, 2002 U.S. LEXIS 2789 (2002), at least one of the definitions in § 6-4-303 is constitutional because it defines child pornography as requiring the use of a real child, and any of the provisions in the Wyoming statute that could be found unconstitutional can be severed from the statute under the general rule of severability provided by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 8-1-103(a)(viii).Rutti v. State, 2004 WY 133, 100 P.3d 394,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. Dec. 14, 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 1019, 125 S. Ct. 1990, 161 L. Ed. 2d 858, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 3781 (U.S. 2005).

Defendant's conviction for violating Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-4-303(a)(ii)(B) did not violate the First Amendment as defendant admitted that the images were child pornography and they were real children, not images virtually indistinguishable from children in accordance with 18 U.S.C.S. § 2256; thus, whether the statute was vague or overbroad had to be determined in a case where the image at issue was alleged to be that of an individual virtually indistinguishable from a child, but not actually a child.
Jones v. State, 2007 WY 201, 173 P.3d 379,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 2007).

Actual victim not required. —

Where defendant engaged in conversation with an undercover detective in an internet chatroom and agreed to meet the person in an agreed-upon location for sexual activity, convictions for attempted sexual exploitation of a child and attempted solicitation to engage in illicit sexual relations in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-4-303(b)(ii) and

14-3-104

(repealed) were upheld; the State was not required to produce an actual child victim for crimes of attempt. Adams v. State, 2005 WY 94, 117 P.3d 1210,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2005).

Cited

in

Perkins v. State, 2014 WY 11,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Jan 24, 2014).

Quoted

in

Large v. State, 2008 WY 22, 177 P.3d 807,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Feb. 28, 2008).

§ 6-4-304.
Voyeurism; penalties.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if he, without the consent of the person being viewed, commits the crime of voyeurism by looking in a clandestine, surreptitious, prying or secretive nature into an area where the person being viewed has a reasonable expectation of privacy, including, but not limited to:

Restrooms;

Baths;

Showers;

Dressing or fitting rooms;

Bedrooms; or

Under the clothing being worn by another person, regardless of whether the person is in a place where the person has a reasonable expectation of privacy.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both, if he:

Commits the offense specified in subsection (a) of this section by knowingly or intentionally capturing an image by means of a camera, a video camera or any other image recording device; or

Uses a camera, video camera or any other image recording device:

For the purpose of observing, viewing, photographing, filming, recording, livestreaming or videotaping the intimate areas of another person;

Under clothing being worn by the other person; and

Without the consent of the other person.

A minor convicted of violating subsection (b) of this section shall be guilty of a status offense as defined in W.S. 7-1-107(b)(iii) and may be fined not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).

A person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older who commits an offense as specified in this section for which the victim is less than eighteen (18) years of age shall be guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment of not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

If a person sentenced under subsection (a) of this section is placed on probation, the court may, notwithstanding any other provision of law, impose a term of probation exceeding the maximum imprisonment of six (6) months, provided the term of probation, including extensions, shall not exceed one (1) year.

A person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older who commits an offense as specified in subsection (a) or (b) of this section who has previously been convicted as an adult of an offense under subsection (a) or (b) of this section or of a similar offense under the laws of another state shall be guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment of not greater than five (5) years, a fine of not greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

As used in this section, “intimate area” means any portion of a person’s pubic area, buttocks, vulva, genitals, female breast or undergarments intended to cover those portions. “Intimate area” does not include intimate areas visible through a person’s clothing or intimate areas knowingly exposed in public.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 173, § 1; 2021 ch. 141, § 1, effective April 7, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

in (a), added "Except as otherwise provided in this section," at the beginning, deleted "enclosed" following "nature into an"; added (a)(v) and (a)(vi); in (b), added "Except as otherwise provided in this section," at the beginning, substituted "five (5)" for "two (2)"; rewrote (b)(ii), which read, "Uses a camera, video camera or any other image recording device for the purpose of observing, viewing, photographing, filming or videotaping another person under the clothing being worn by the other person where that other person has not consented to the observing, viewing, photographing, filming or videotaping"; added (c) through (g); and made related changes.

Laws 2021, ch. 141, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 7, 2021.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 173, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 6-4-305.
Dissemination or possession of a nude image of a minor by a minor; definitions; penalties.

As used in this section:

“Disseminate” means to sell, distribute, deliver, provide, publish, transmit, text, email, exhibit or otherwise make available to another person but does not include any action taken to notify a person in a position of authority of the existence of a nude image of a minor;

“Juvenile detention facility” means as defined in W.S. 7-1-107(b)(i);

“Minor” means an individual who is under the age of eighteen (18) years;

“Nude image” means a photograph or video depicting a person’s genitalia, perineum, anus or pubic area or the breast of a female. The term does not include a depiction of explicit sexual conduct as defined in W.S. 6-4-303(a)(iii).

A minor is guilty of dissemination or possession of a nude image of a minor in the third degree if he knowingly:

Disseminates a nude image of himself; or

Possesses a nude image of another minor who is at least eleven (11) years of age unless the minor inadvertently came into possession of the image and took reasonable steps to destroy the image or notify a person in a position of authority of its existence.

A minor is guilty of dissemination of a nude image of a minor in the second degree if he knowingly disseminates a nude image of another minor who is at least eleven (11) years of age.

A minor is guilty of dissemination or possession of a nude image of a minor in the first degree if, with the intent to coerce, intimidate, torment, harass or otherwise cause emotional distress to another minor, the minor:

Disseminates or threatens to disseminate a nude image of another minor who is at least eleven (11) years of age; or

Captures a nude image of another minor who is at least eleven (11) years of age without the knowledge of the depicted minor.

A minor convicted of violating subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a status offense as defined in W.S. 7-1-107(b)(iii) and may be fined not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).

A minor convicted of violating subsection (c) or (d) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by:

For a violation of subsection (c) of this section, a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), imprisonment in a juvenile detention facility for not more than three (3) months, or both;

For a violation of subsection (d) of this section, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment in a juvenile detention facility for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

2017 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 190, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 6-4-306.
Unlawful dissemination of intimate images; definitions; penalties; exemptions from liability.

As used in this section:

“Displaying sexual acts” means displaying an image of sexual acts regardless of whether a person’s intimate parts are visible in the image;

“Disseminate” means to sell, distribute, deliver, provide, exhibit, post on social media or otherwise make available to a third party, but shall not include displaying an intimate image in private to the person depicted in the image;

“Image” means a photograph, film, videotape, recording, digital file or any other recording, including a computer generated image that purports to represent an identifiable person;

“Intimate image” means an image of a person’s intimate parts or of a person engaging in sexual acts when the person depicted is identifiable from the image itself or from information displayed with or otherwise connected to the image;

“Intimate parts” means the external genitalia, perineum, anus or pubic area of any person or the breast of a female person;

“Sexual acts” means sexual intercourse, cunnilingus, fellatio, analingus, anal intercourse or any intrusion, however slight, by any object or any part of a person’s body into the genital or anal opening of another person’s body if the intrusion can reasonably be construed as being for the purpose of sexual arousal, gratification or abuse;

“Social media” means any electronic medium, including an interactive computer service, telephone network or data network, that allows users to create, share, post or view user generated content, including but not limited to images, videos, still photographs, blogs, video blogs, podcasts, instant messages, electronic mail or internet website profiles.

A person eighteen (18) years of age or older is guilty of the offense of disseminating an intimate image if the person:

Disseminated an intimate image of another person;

Knew or should have known that the depicted person had a reasonable expectation that the image would remain private and the depicted person did not expressly give consent for the image’s dissemination; and

Intended:

To humiliate, harm, harass, threaten or coerce another; or

For sexual gratification or arousal of others or of the person disseminating the intimate image.

Dissemination of an intimate image is a misdemeanor punishable by not more than one (1) year imprisonment, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

Nothing in the section shall be construed to impose criminal liability on the provider of an interactive computer service as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 230, an information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 153 or a telecommunications service as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 153, for content provided by another person.

History.

2021 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 85, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.